Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-330
Gross vehicle weight, defined.

Gross vehicle weight means the sum of the empty weights of a truck or truck-tractor and the empty weights of any trailer, semitrailer, or combination thereof with which the truck or truck-tractor is to be operated in combination at any one time, plus the weight of the maximum load to be carried thereon at any one time.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 30.